Massachusetts, session 194th, S2566.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 260 of the acts of 1956 is hereby amended by striking out sections 
1 and 2 and inserting in place thereof the following 2 sections:-  
Section 1. There is hereby created a body politic and corporate to be known as the 
Gloucester Fisheries Commission, which shall be a public instrumentality for the purposes of this 
act and shall have an official seal as determined by the membership of the commission.  
Section 2. The commission shall be set up and sponsored by the city of Gloucester to 
investigate, advocate and recommend measures for the promotion, preservation and protection of 
the Gloucester fishing industry. 
SECTION 2. Said chapter 260 is hereby further amended by striking out section 3, as 
most recently amended by chapter 338 of the acts of 1984, and inserting in place thereof the 
following section:-  

of 2 12  Section 3. The commission shall consist of 7 members, 1 of whom shall be the mayor or 
a designee and 6 of whom shall be appointed by the mayor and confirmed by the city council for 
3-year terms. The mayor may appoint, subject to confirmation by the city council, 2 alternate 
members. The initial members of the commission shall serve staggered terms. The members of 
the commission shall be residents of the city of Gloucester and shall be knowledgeable of the 
fishing industry. The chair and vice chair shall be elected by a majority vote of the members 
present and voting thereon. 
SECTION 3. Said chapter 260 is hereby further amended by striking out section 3A, as 
most recently amended by section 2 of chapter 361 of the acts of 1980, and inserting in place 
thereof the following section:-  
Section 3A. The mayor may appoint an executive director who shall receive such 
compensation as determined by the mayor. 
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect upon its passage.